Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.082

Appeal—No bond required.

No bond of any kind shall be required of a claimant appealing to the superior court, the court of appeals, or the supreme court from a finding of the department affecting the claimant's right to retirement or disability benefits.

[ 1991 c 35 s 95; 1971 c 81 s 105; 1951 c 50 s 16. Formerly RCW 41.40.440.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.